Utah statutes.
23-13-4.   Captivity of protected wildlife unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person to hold in captivity at any time any protected wildlife except as provided by this code or rules and regulations of the Wildlife Board.



Enacted by Chapter 46, 1971 General Session

